Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Child Protective Services
§ 14-3-214.
Confidentiality of records; penalties; access to information; attendance of school officials at interviews; access to central registry records pertaining to child protection cases.

All records concerning reports and investigations of child abuse or neglect are confidential except as provided by W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

. Any person who willfully violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, applications for access to records concerning child abuse or neglect contained in the state agency or local child protective agency shall be made in the manner and form prescribed by the state agency. Upon appropriate application, the state agency shall give access to any of the following persons or agencies for purposes directly related with the administration of W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-216

:

A local child protective agency;

A law enforcement agency, guardian ad litem, child protection team or the attorney representing the subject of the report;

A physician or surgeon who is treating an abused or neglected child, the child’s family or a child he reasonably suspects may have been abused or neglected;

A person legally authorized to place a child in protective temporary custody when information in the report or record is required to determine whether to place the child in temporary protective custody;

A person responsible for the welfare of the child;

A court or grand jury upon a showing that access to the records is necessary for the determination of an issue, in which case access shall be limited to in camera inspection unless the court finds public disclosure is necessary;

Court personnel who are investigating reported incidents of child abuse or neglect;

An education or mental health professional serving the child, if the state agency determines the information is necessary to provide appropriate educational or therapeutic interventions.

A physician or person in charge of an institution, school, facility or agency making the report shall receive, upon written application to the state agency, a summary of the records concerning the subject of the report.

Any person, agency or institution given access to information concerning the subject of the report shall not divulge or make public any information except as required for court proceedings.

Nothing in W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

prohibits the attendance of any one (1) of the following at an interview conducted on school property by law enforcement or child protective agency personnel of a child suspected to be abused or neglected provided the person is not a subject of the allegation:

The principal of the child’s school or his designee; or

A child’s teacher or, counselor, or specialist employed by the school or school district and assigned the duties of monitoring, reviewing or assisting in the child’s welfare in cases of suspected child abuse or neglect.

Upon appropriate application, the state agency shall provide to any employer or entity whose employees or volunteers may have unsupervised access to children in the course of their employment or volunteer service, for employee or volunteer screening purposes, a summary of central registry records maintained under state agency rules since December 31, 1986, for purposes of screening employees or volunteers. The state agency shall provide the results of the records check to the applicant by certified mail if the records check confirms the existence of a report “under investigation” or a “substantiated” finding of abuse or neglect. Otherwise, the state agency shall provide the results of the records check to the applicant in accordance with agency rules and by United States mail. The written results shall confirm that there is a report “under investigation”, a “substantiated” finding of abuse or neglect on the central registry naming the individual or confirm that no record exists. When the individual is identified on the registry as a “substantiated” perpetrator of abuse or neglect, the report to the applicant shall contain information with respect to the date of the finding, specific type of abuse or neglect, a copy of the perpetrator’s voluntary statement and whether an appeal is pending. The applicant, or an agent on behalf of the applicant, shall submit a fee in an amount determined by rule of the state agency and proof satisfactory to the state agency that the prospective or current employee or volunteer whose records are being checked consents to the release of the information to the applicant. The applicant shall use the information received only for purposes of screening prospective or current employees and volunteers who may, through their employment or volunteer services, have unsupervised access to minors. Applicants, their employees or other agents shall not otherwise divulge or make public any information received under this section. The state agency shall notify any applicant receiving information under this subsection of any subsequent reclassification of the information pursuant to W.S. 14-3-213(e). The state agency shall screen all prospective agency employees in conformity with the procedure provided under this subsection.

There is created a program administration account to be known as the “child and vulnerable adult abuse registry account”. All fees collected under subsection (f) of this section shall be credited to this account.

No information, including recorded interviews of the child, shall be disclosed to any person in any civil proceeding not related to an abuse or neglect case brought under this article except upon order of the court which shall determine if good cause exists to disclose the information. Any protective order granting disclosure shall include appropriate protections against further dissemination in any form. The court may conduct an in camera review of a recorded interview prior to issuing a protective order and may impose such conditions as may be appropriate under the circumstances of the proceeding to prevent further dissemination of the recorded interview.

Any person may request a central registry screen and summary report on themselves as provided by subsection (f) of this section upon payment of the fee required by subsection (f) of this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.14; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-125; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1985, ch. 130, § 1; 1991, ch. 113, § 2; 1994, ch. 39, § 1; 1995, ch. 136, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 86, § 2; 2005, ch. 23, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; ch. 236, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2015 ch. 191, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (b)(viii); and rewrote (f), modifying notification procedures for employees and volunteers under investigation, and otherwise conforming the provisions in accordance with Laws 2005, ch. 23.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (g), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “program administration account.”

The third 2005 amendment, by ch. 236, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “14-3-216” for “14-3-215.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating the amendments by all three 2005 acts.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “and” at the end of (b)(vi).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), inserted the introduction “Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section” and created a new subsection (h).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (f), substituted “employer or entity whose employees or volunteers may have unsupervised access to children in the course of their employment or volunteer service” for “employer or entity whose employees or volunteers may have unsupervised access to children in the course of their employment or volunteer service” in the first sentence, added “in accordance with agency rules and” in the third sentence, “or an agent on behalf of the applicant” in the fifth sentence, and “or current” in the sixth sentence; and added (j).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "in an amount determined by rule of the state agency" for "of ten dollars ($10.00) " in the sixth sentence of (f).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Victim's records not released unless constitutionally material. —

Where a defendant was charged with taking indecent liberties with a minor, the nondisclosure to defense counsel of school records concerning the child did not deny the defendant his constitutional rights to a fair trial and to confront witnesses and to compulsory process, nor did the trial court err in conducting an in-camera review of the records and applying a standard of constitutional materiality in determining which records, if any, were to be released to defendant's counsel. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1990).

Admission of juvenile court records in parental rights termination proceeding. —

Court did not err in allowing records in a juvenile court neglect proceeding to be used in a parental rights termination proceeding; use of such records is entirely proper and in accord with the Child Protection Services statutes' purpose of protecting the best interests of the child. SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs.(In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2005).

Applied in

LeBlanc v. State (In re ARLeB), 2017 WY 107, 401 P.3d 932,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Johnson v. State, 922 P.2d 1384,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 14-3-215.
Interagency children's collaborative.

There is created an interagency children’s collaborative. The collaborative shall be composed of:

The director of the department of family services, or his designee;

The director of the department of health, or his designee;

The superintendent of public instruction, or his designee;

The director of the department of workforce services, or his designee; and

The governor’s appointee who shall represent families receiving services from the state agencies represented in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection.

The department of family services shall adopt rules by July 1, 2005, to establish guidelines for review of case files of children in state custody as a result of any action commenced under this title. The rules shall be adopted by the department of family services with the advice of the departments of education, health and workforce services. In addition to providing for the review of cases and the progress made towards returning children in state custody to their homes, communities or other permanent placements, the guidelines shall provide specific processes for:

Local multidisciplinary teams to voluntarily present case files to the collaborative for review;

The review of cases in which more than one (1) state agency provides services to the child and his family; and

The review of statewide availability and utilization of resources for children in state custody.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

A former §

14-3-215

was renumbered as §

14-3-216

by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 3.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 5(a), makes
§ 14-3-215(a) effective July 1, 2005.
Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 5(b), makes
§ 14-3-215(b) effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.

Cited in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 14-3-216.
Other laws not superseded.

No laws of this state are superseded by the provisions of W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-216

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.15; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-126; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; W.S. 1977, 14–3–215; Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 3.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, renumbered this section, which was formerly numbered as §

14-3-215

, and substituted “14-3-216” for “14-3-215.”